test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-hain46_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - hain: # Noun (46) hain 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     hain+N+Sg+Nom: hain
     hain+N+Sg+Gen: haina
     hain+N+Sg+Par: haina
     hain+N+Sg+Ill: haina
     hain+N+Pl+Gen: haino
     hain+N+Pl+Par: haino
     hain+N+Pl+Ill: [hainohe, haino]
     hain+N+Pl+All: hainolõ
